Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-648
Denial of refund, reimbursement of
fees, or replacement; conditions.

No refund or reimbursement of fees or replacement of a pet
animal under section 54-647 shall be required if one or more of the following
conditions exist:

(1) The serious
health problem or death of the pet animal resulted from maltreatment, neglect,
or injury occurring after delivery of the pet animal to the purchaser;

(2) Any written
disclosure statements provided by a seller pursuant to subsection (2) of section
54-646 disclosed the serious health problem for which the purchaser is seeking
a remedy; or

(3) The purchaser failed to follow through with preventative care,
including, but not limited to, vaccinations, deworming treatment, or medication,
recommended by a licensed veterinarian examining the pet animal.

Laws 2009, LB241, § 15.